Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 77. Norwich University

§§ 2421,
2422.
Repealed. 1965, No. 198, § 12.

§§ 2423-2470.
[Reserved for future use.]

§ 2471.
Military college of State; rank of faculty and staff.

Norwich University is hereby recognized as the military college of the State of Vermont, and its faculty and administrative staff shall have local rank assigned by the trustees as follows: the President shall have general officer rank; and the Dean, heads of departments, and members of the faculty and administrative staff shall have a rank below the rank of the President comparable to the position on the faculty as prescribed by the Board of Trustees of Norwich University, all without pay from the State.

HISTORY:

Amended

1979, No. 4

.

§ 2472.
Repealed. 1965, No. 198, § 12.

§ 2473.
Repealed.
1959, No. 252, § 9.

§ 2474.
Repealed.
1965, No. 198, § 12.

§ 2475.
Repealed.
1969, No. 16, § 14, eff. March 11, 1969.